Hawaii statutes.
[§554B-9] Use of custodial trust property.
(a) The custodial trustee shall pay to the beneficiary or expend for the
beneficiary's benefit so much or all of the custodial trust property as the
beneficiary while not incapacitated may direct from time to time.

(b) If the beneficiary is incapacitated, the
custodial trustee shall expend so much or all of the custodial trust property
as the custodial trustee determines advisable for the use and benefit of the
beneficiary and individuals who were supported by the beneficiary at the time
the beneficiary became incapacitated, or who are legally entitled to support by
the beneficiary. Expenditures may be made in the manner, at the time, and to
the extent that the custodial trustee determines suitable and proper, without
court order and without regard to other support, income, or property of the
beneficiary.

(c) A custodial trustee may establish
checking, savings, or other similar accounts of reasonable amounts under which
either the custodial trustee or the beneficiary may withdraw funds from, or
draw checks against, the accounts. Funds withdrawn from or checks written
against the account by the beneficiary are treated as distributions of
custodial trust property by the custodial trustee to the beneficiary. [L 1989,
c 76, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next